Montana, session 2025, LC2212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Prohibition on nonresident interference in constitutional initiatives.
(1) It is unlawful for an individual who is not a resident of the state, as provided under 13-1-112, directly or
through an intermediary, to make a disbursement for an electioneering communication, a contribution, or an
expenditure, or make an express or implied promise to make a contribution or an expenditure, in connection
with any constitutional initiative.
(2) It is unlawful for a person to solicit, accept, or receive a contribution, expenditure, or
disbursement described in subsection (1) from an individual who is not a resident of the state, as provided
under 13-1-112.
(3) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) is liable in a civil action pursuant to 13-37-128.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 13, chapter 37, part 2, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 37, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****